Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1

Appellate Courts

16-2-101. Grand divisions — Appeals from Marion County.

For the administration of justice in the supreme court, the court of appeals and the court of criminal appeals, the state is divided into the three (3) grand divisions described in §§ 4-1-201 — 4-1-204.

All appeals, writs of error and appeals in the nature of a writ of error from the chancery and circuit courts of Marion County shall be granted to and heard by the supreme court, the court of appeals and the court of criminal appeals, within their respective jurisdictions, sitting at Nashville.

Code 1858, § 100 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 8); Shan., § 129; Acts 1923, ch. 70; Code 1932, § 147; Acts 1941, ch. 17, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 147, 148; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-201.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure, 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Comparative Legislation. Judicial divisions:

Ala. Code § 12-11-2.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 15-6-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 21A.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 9-5-3 et seq.; § 9-7-3 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 478.073 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 17-119.1:1 et seq.

Collateral References. Courts
50, 74, 75.

16-2-102. Places where supreme court sessions held.

The supreme court for the eastern division is held at Knoxville; for the middle division, at Nashville; and for the western division, at Jackson. In addition to the places where the supreme court is required to be held by the Constitution of Tennessee, it may be held in other places that the chief justice may from time to time designate.

Code 1858, § 104; Acts 1867-1868, ch. 76, § 1; 1869-1870, ch. 18, § 1; 1870, ch. 24, § 3; Shan., § 133; Code 1932, § 151; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-202; Acts 1984, ch. 713, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Places where supreme court to hold court, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.10.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

Collateral References. Courts
74.

16-2-103. Times of supreme court sessions.

The court shall hold one (1) session each year, as follows: at Knoxville on the second Monday in September; at Nashville on the first Monday in December; and at Jackson on the first Monday in April of each year.

Code 1858, § 105; Acts 1877, ch. 4, § 1; Shan., § 134; Code 1932, § 152; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-203.

Cross-References. Places where supreme court to hold court, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

16-2-104. Transfer of supreme court cases between divisions.

The supreme court is empowered to direct the hearing of all of the cases coming to the supreme court from any county, in any division of the state, in any other division of the state; provided, that all appeals, appeals in error, writs of error, petitions for certiorari and all other proceedings for the correction of error arising in the respective divisions shall be taken to Knoxville, Nashville and Jackson, transcripts there filed, and all decrees, orders and judgments shall be entered at Knoxville, Nashville and Jackson; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with or dispense with the regular sittings of the supreme court at Knoxville, Nashville and Jackson, for the trial and disposition of the causes in the respective grand divisions of the state, but that this section shall only apply to emergency causes, to causes wherein the general public welfare demands a speedy hearing, to causes involving the title to any public office, or to causes where the parties agree thereto, arising in any grand division, either during vacation or when the court is sitting in some other grand division, or to the consideration and decision of causes which the court, sitting in any grand division, has not had time to decide before adjourning.

Acts 1915, ch. 95, § 1; Shan., § 135a1; Code 1932, § 154; Acts 1939, ch. 17, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 154; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-204.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 218.

Law Reviews.

Appellate Practice — Advancing Case for Hearing Out of Regular Order, 12 Tenn. L. Rev. 130.

16-2-105. Transfer of supreme court cases by consent of parties.

The hearing and determination of any case, other than those involving emergency or general public welfare referred to in § 16-2-104, may, upon written application, presented in person by counsel representing all parties, and with the unanimous approval of the court, be transferred from any one (1) grand division to the court sitting in any other grand division of the state, this provision being intended to expedite the hearing of important cases, the speedy determination of which is advisable.

Acts 1923, ch. 70, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 135a6; mod. Code 1932, § 158; modified; Acts 1963, ch. 111, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-205.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

16-2-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-2-106 (Acts 1931 (2nd E.S.), ch. 38, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 159; 1973, ch. 356, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-206), concerning judicial circuits and chancery divisions, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 15, which repealed this section except insofar as this section divided existing circuit, criminal or chancery courts into parts or divisions. It was the intent of the general assembly to create new judicial districts in accordance with § 16-2-506, but to retain and continue the existing parts or divisions of the courts as they are set out. For present provisions relating to judicial districts, see part 5 of this chapter.

Attorney General Opinions. Unless expressly authorized by T.C.A. §§ 16-2-106 through 16-2-402 or a private act, neither a general sessions nor a circuit court may regularly hold its sessions outside the city limits of the county seat, OAG 05-122 (8/8/05).

16-2-107. Transfer of cause of action.

In judicial districts that have a separate circuit and chancery court or in districts that have more than one (1) division of circuit or chancery court, if a civil cause of action is filed in the improper court or the improper division of court within the judicial district, upon the motion of either party, or upon the court's own motion, the civil cause of action may be transferred to the proper court or proper division within such district.

Acts 1991, ch. 265, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Flowers v. Dyer County: The Death of the Motion to Dismiss for Lack of Subject Matter Jurisdiction, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 409 (1993).

Cited: Spann v. Abraham, 36 S.W.3d 452, 1999 Tenn. App. LEXIS 746 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1999).